District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.02

Annuity — Deposit in United States Treasury.

The amount so deducted and withheld from the annual salary of every teacher shall be deposited in the Treasury of the United States and shall be credited, together with interest at 4% per annum, compounded annually, to an individual account of the teacher from whose salary the deduction is made, which account shall be kept by the Auditor of the District of Columbia. The fund thus created shall be held and invested by the Treasurer of the United States until paid out as hereinafter provided, and the income derived from such investments shall constitute a part of said fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 387, ch. 39, § 2
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 727, ch. 556, § 1
This section is referenced in § 38-2021.02.
1981 Ed., § 31-1202.
1973 Ed., § 31-702.
Office of Auditor abolished: The Office of the Auditor of the District of Columbia was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 3 of the Board of Commissioners, dated August 28, 1952, and effective September 2, 1952, established, under the direction and control of the Board of Commissioners, a Department of General Administration headed by a Director. The Order transferred to the Director of General Administration all of the functions of the Office of Auditor. Reorganization Order No. 19 established the Internal Audit Office headed by an Internal Audit Officer in the Department of General Administration. The function of certifying as to the accuracy of the yearly financial statement of the Armory Board was transferred to the Internal Audit Office. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Reorganization Order Nos. 3 and 19 were revoked by Organization Order No. 3 of the Commissioner of the District of Columbia, dated December 13, 1967. Organization Order No. 3 established within the newly created Department of General Administration an Internal Audit Office and prescribed the functions thereof. These functions were subsequently transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. Part IVB of Organization Order No. 3 and that portion of paragraph 4 of Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96 pertaining to a transfer of audit functions to the Department of Finance and Revenue were revoked by Organization Order No. 33, dated July 14, 1972. The latter Order established an Office of Municipal Audit and Inspection and prescribed the functions thereof. Organization Order No. 50, dated December 31, 1974, established the Office of Budget and Management Systems, and transferred to that office the functions of the Municipal Audit Office. The Office of Budget and Management Systems was replaced by Mayor’s Order 79-5, dated January 2, 1977, which Order established the Office of Budget and Revenue Development.